District of Columbia statutes.
34-732

Construction of §§ 34-706 and 34-731.

The provisions of §§ 34-706 and 34-731 relating to the orders, rules, and regulations of the Public Service Commission may be enforced either as provided in § 34-706 or § 34-731.

Apr. 5, 1939, 53 Stat. 569, ch. 40, § 2
Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 88-503, § 21
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-153, § 4(b), 31 DCR 6440
1981 Ed., § 43-308.
1973 Ed., § 43-908.